Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Chapter 6 Implied Consent to Chemical Testing
§ 31-6-102.
Test to determine alcoholic or controlled substance content of blood; suspension of license.

If arrested for an offense as defined by W.S.

31-5-233

:

Any person who drives or is in actual physical control of a motor vehicle upon a public street or highway in this state is deemed to have given consent, subject to the provisions of this act, to a chemical test or tests of his blood, breath or urine for the purpose of determining the alcohol concentration or controlled substance content of his blood. The test or tests shall be:

Incidental to a lawful arrest;

Given as promptly as possible after the arrest;

Administered at the direction of a peace officer who has probable cause to believe the person was driving or in actual physical control of a motor vehicle upon a public street or highway in this state in violation of W.S.

31-5-233

(b) or any other law prohibiting driving under the influence as defined by W.S. 31-5-233(a)(v). The peace officer who requires a test for alcohol concentration pursuant to this section may direct that the test shall be of blood, breath or urine. However, if the officer directs that the test be of the person’s blood or urine, the person may choose whether the test shall be of blood or urine. The person shall not have the option if the peace officer has probable cause to believe there is impairment by a controlled substance which is not subject to testing by a breath test in which case a blood or urine test may be required, as directed by the peace officer.

For tests required under this act, the arrested person shall be advised that:

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 178, § 2.

If the results of the test indicate the person is under the influence of alcohol or a controlled substance, he may be subject to criminal penalties, his Wyoming driver’s license or his privilege to operate a motor vehicle shall be suspended for ninety (90) days and he may be required to drive only vehicles equipped with an ignition interlock device;

After undergoing all chemical tests required by the peace officer at a place and in a manner prescribed by and at the expense of the agency employing the peace officer, the arrested person may go to the nearest hospital or clinic and secure any additional tests at his own expense;

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 160, § 2.

The results from the test or tests under this act shall only be used for the purposes of determining the chemical concentration as provided by this section and shall not be used for any other purpose.

Results of tests obtained at the arrested person’s expense shall be made available to the arresting officer and the arrested person. Disclosure of the test results by the person administering the test is not a violation of the doctor-patient relationship.

Any person dead, unconscious or otherwise in a condition rendering him incapable of cooperating with the administration of the tests is deemed to have given his consent provided by subsection (a) of this section and the tests may be administered subject to the provisions of this act.

If a person under arrest refuses upon the request of a peace officer to submit to a chemical test designated by the agency employing the peace officer as provided in subsection (a) of this section, none shall be given except in cases where serious bodily injury or death has resulted or upon issuance of a search warrant. A test of the agency’s choice may be administered upon issuance of a warrant, including a remotely communicated search warrant, when reasonable under the circumstances and as provided in this subsection. A remotely communicated search warrant may be issued upon sworn or affirmed testimony of the peace officer who is not in the physical presence of a judicial officer, provided the judicial officer is satisfied that probable cause exists for the issuance of the warrant. All communication between the judicial officer and the peace officer or prosecuting attorney requesting the warrant may be remotely transmitted by voice, image, text or any combination thereof, or by other means and shall be recorded. The testimony and content of the warrant shall be recorded by writing or mechanical, magnetic, electronic, photographic storage or by other means. Upon approval, the judicial officer may direct a peace officer or the prosecuting attorney requesting a warrant from a remote location to sign the judicial officer’s name on a warrant at a remote location. A remotely communicated search warrant shall be valid only for purposes specified in this subsection.

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 178, § 2.

If the test result indicates the person has an alcohol concentration of eight one-hundredths of one percent (0.08%) or more, the peace officer shall submit his signed statement to the department. Based upon the statement the department shall suspend the person’s Wyoming driver’s license or his privilege to operate a motor vehicle in this state for ninety (90) days. If a criminal conviction results from the same incident on which a suspension under this subsection is based, the suspension under W.S. 31-7-128(b) or revocation under W.S. 31-7-127(a)(ii) shall be reduced by ninety (90) days. The statement submitted by the officer shall contain:

His probable cause to believe the arrested person was driving or in actual physical control of a motor vehicle:

On a public street or highway in this state;

In violation of W.S. 31-5-233(b) or any other law prohibiting driving under the influence as defined by W.S. 31-5-233(a)(v).

That a test was taken of the person; and

The person had an alcohol concentration of eight one-hundredths of one percent (0.08%) or more.

In addition to the signed statement submitted under subsection (e) of this section, the peace officer shall issue the person a temporary license similar to but in lieu of the license authorized under W.S.

31-7-138

. This temporary license shall be valid for thirty (30) days, shall not be renewed, shall contain a notice that the person has twenty (20) days from the date of issuance within which to request a hearing from the department and that failure to timely request a hearing will result in the suspension automatically commencing upon expiration of the temporary license or upon expiration of any existing suspension or revocation if the person’s license or privilege is suspended or revoked at the time the temporary license is issued. W.S.

31-7-138

(d) and (e) apply to a license under this section. For purposes of this section, the peace officer acts as an agent for the department when providing notice of the suspension and notice of the opportunity for a hearing. W.S.

31-7-137

applies to a notice under this act. Failure to demand a hearing within the twenty (20) day period is a waiver of the right of hearing, and the suspension shall commence upon expiration of the temporary license or upon expiration of any existing suspension or revocation if the person’s license or privilege is suspended or revoked at the time the temporary license is issued. If a timely demand for hearing is made, the department shall forward the demand to the independent hearing examiner who shall schedule a hearing within forty-five (45) days after receipt of the request and provide the arrested person at least ten (10) days notice of the hearing. The hearing shall be conducted by the hearing examiner. If the hearing examiner fails to schedule the hearing within forty-five (45) days of the request, other than at the request of the licensee, the licensee, as his sole remedy, shall be given credit against any action upheld at the hearing for the time between the expiration of the forty-five (45) day period and the date the hearing was first scheduled.

For the purposes of this section, the signed statement submitted by the peace officer shall be deemed a sworn statement and shall be subject to penalties for perjury.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 158, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 31-247.2; Laws 1973, ch. 195, § 1; 1977, ch. 13, § 1; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1985, ch. 211, § 1; ch. 234, § 2; 1986, ch. 75, § 1; 1987, ch. 131, § 1; 1989, ch. 119, § 2; 1996, ch. 11, § 1; ch. 57, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 61, § 1; 2007, ch. 207, § 1; 2009, ch. 160, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 178, §§ 1, 2.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a)(i)(C) inserted “for alcohol concentration”, substituted “shall not have the” for “has this” following “The person”, substituted “if” for “unless” preceding “the peace officer”, deleted “blood or” preceding “breath test in which”, inserted “blood or” preceding “urine test may be” and inserted “, as directed by the peace officer” at the end of the last sentence.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added “and he may be required to drive only vehicles equipped with an ignition interlock device” in (a)(ii)(A) and (a)(ii)(B), and made related changes; and repealed (a)(ii)(D), which read: “If he refuses to take all required tests, he shall not be eligible for limited driving privileges.”

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, repealed former (a)(ii)(A), pertaining to suspension of driver's license or privileges for failure to submit required tests; in (a)(ii)(B), substituted “the results of the test” for “a test is taken and the results”; in (a)(ii)(C), substituted “undergoing all chemical tests required” for “submitting to all required chemical tests requested”; added (a)(iii); in (c), substituted “cooperating with the administration of” for “refusal to submit to”; in (d), added “or upon issuance of a search warrant” at the end of the first sentence, deleted the former introductory clause that read: “The peace officer shall submit his signed statement to the department. The statement submitted by the officer shall contain,” and added the last six sentences; repealed former (d)(i) and (d)(ii) pertaining to statements submitted by peace officers; in the introductory language of (e), deleted “a person submits to chemical testing and” following “If”; in (e)(ii), inserted “a test was taken of,” and deleted “submitted to a test” following “person”; and in (f), substituted “subsection (e)” for “subsection (d) or (e)” in the first sentence.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in subsections (a), (c) and (f), see § 31-6-101(a)(v).

Consent to chemical testing. —

Read together, the statutes said an accused may go and secure any additional blood alcohol tests but the failure or inability to obtain an additional test had no bearing on an officer’s own test, and it was not an officer’s responsibility to ensure he obtained any test; the law enforcement officers did not deprive the driver of his right to an independent chemical test of his blood alcohol content, and his statutory and due process rights were not violated. Johnson v. State ex rel. Wyo. DOT, 2021 WY 116, 497 P.3d 895,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 2021).

Constitutional affidavit requirement satisfied by remotely communicated search warrant. —

In response to certified questions, the Supreme Court of Wyoming determined that the statutory procedures for a remotely communicated search warrant in a matter involving driving while under the influence of alcohol were constitutional because they complied with the constitutional search warrant affidavit requirements. Smith v. State, 2013 WY 122, 311 P.3d 132,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 2013).

Compliance with general warrant requirements as well as remotely communicated search warrant reqirements. —

In response to certified questions, the Supreme Court of Wyoming determined that a police officer who followed the statutory procedures for a remotely communicated search warrant in a matter involving driving while under the influence of alcohol had to comply with the rule for general search warrant requirements as well because they complemented, rather than contradicted, one another; further, and an officer seeking such a warrant, as well as the issuing judicial officer, could comply with both. Smith v. State, 2013 WY 122, 311 P.3d 132,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 2013).

Suspension proceedings civil in nature. —

Office of Administrative Hearing’s decision upholding the suspension of appellant’s driver’s license and operating privileges was affirmed because appellant’s inability to obtain an independent blood alcohol test was not caused by law enforcement, but was a result of appellant’s inability to pay. Flauding v. State ex rel. Wyo. DOT, 2021 WY 131, 499 P.3d 272,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(Wyo. 2021).

Purpose. —

The purpose of this section is remedial in that it was enacted to facilitate the removal of drunk drivers from the highways. Glasrud v. City of Laramie, 934 P.2d 1242,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1997).

Applicable only to “arrest.” —

Since the decedent had not been arrested for driving under the influence at the time the blood test was conducted, the test was not taken incidental to a lawful arrest. By its own terms, the implied consent statute cannot apply when the coroner conducts the test. Johnson v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div., 911 P.2d 1054,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1996).

Authority of federal officer. —

This section states that a breathalyzer test may be administered by a peace officer which is defined by §

7-2-101

to include various positions, all of which share one important common fact: they are state employees. However, if a federal officer is precluded from administering a breathalyzer test under this section to an individual who is arrested on federal property, based on probable cause to believe that the individual was violating §

31-5-233

by driving a motor vehicle while intoxicated, then it stands to follow that no one could administer a breath test to that individual. This literal reading would lead to an absurd result; therefore, the federal airman officer could execute the breathalyzer test on federal property. United States v. Santiago, 846 F. Supp. 1486, 1994 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2766 (D. Wyo. 1994).

Consent to chemical testing. —

District court properly dismissed, for lack of a justiciable controversy, a driver’s request for a declaration that the state constitution precluded a law enforcement officer from statutorily deeming the driver’s consent to chemical testing because, while the loss of driving privileges was a genuine, tangible, and existing interest, the officer did not “deem” the driver’s consent to breath testing, rather the driver “agreed” to take the test, therefore, a declaration would have no effect on the admissibility of the breath sample that sustained the suspension of the driver’s license, the district court lacked the jurisdiction to consider the driver’s request for declaratory relief, and mootness was not the basis for the dismissal. Leavitt v. Wyo. DOT, 2017 WY 149, 406 P.3d 1266,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 2017).

Detention by Bureau of Indian Affairs officers. —

Driver's detention by Bureau of Indian Affairs (BIA) officers for driving while under the influence (DWUI) did not render his subsequent arrest by deputy sheriff unlawful because the driver could not have been arrested and prosecuted within the tribal court system as he was not a tribal member, and he could not have been arrested by the BIA officer and prosecuted within the federal system because the DWUI offense was a State offense, he was therefore subject to arrest and prosecution by the State. The BIA officer properly detained the driver for formal arrest by a state officer, and the deputy sheriff had the authority to enforce the DWUI and implied consent statutes.
Colyer v. State, 2009 WY 43, 203 P.3d 1104,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 2009).

Chemical test not authorized in every instance of arrest for driving under influence. —

There is no authority which requires that a person arrested for the offense of driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor shall, in every instance, be administered a chemical test of his blood, breath or urine, nor is there authority for the contention that, if a test is requested by an arrested person, it has to be given and the failure to give it invalidates the arrest. Hammer v. Jackson, 524 P.2d 884,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 223

(Wyo. 1974).

Implied consent law is exclusive means and required procedure to determine blood-alcohol level

where a suspect is arrested and the law enforcement officer has probable cause to suspect a violation of §

31-5-233

.State v. Chastain, 594 P.2d 458,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 416

(Wyo. 1979), overruled, Olson v. State, 698 P.2d 107,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 471

(Wyo. 1985); Van Order v. State, 600 P.2d 1056,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 463

(Wyo. 1979).

Reasonable suspicion to detain driver for field sobriety tests. —

Trooper had reasonable suspicion to detain the driver from the purpose of performing the field sobriety tests, and therefore the suspension of the driver's license was affirmed, because: (1) he smelled alcohol; (2) the driver admitted that he had been drinking shortly before he was stopped; (3) the driver was unable to locate proof of insurance; and (4) he knowingly violated a traffic law by driving with a broken headlight.
Batten v. Wyo. DOT Drivers' License Div., 2007 WY 173, 170 P.3d 1236,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 2007).

Substantial evidence supported the Office of Administrative Hearings'
(OAH) decision to uphold the suspension of the driver's license for failing to submit to chemical testing pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

31-6-102

because: (1) the trooper stated that he saw the driver's vehicle cross over the center line and the fog line more than once; and (2) the OAH reviewed the DVD of the incident, which showed the vehicle drifting from one side of lane to the other more than once and therefore corroborated the trooper's statements, even though it did not depict clearly whether the vehicle crossed over the lines due to its poor quality and limited duration. Taken together, the trooper's report and the DVD constituted relevant evidence from which a reasonable mind could conclude that the trooper had probable cause to stop the vehicle for a traffic violation, namely driving under the influence or failing to drive within the lanes.
Tiernan v. State, DOT, 2011 WY 143, 262 P.3d 561,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. 2011), overruled in part, Allgier v. State, 2015 WY 137, 358 P.3d 1271,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Wyo. 2015).

Before test is given, information specified in subsection (a) must be given

to a defendant and the defendant's consent to the test must be in the light of that information. State v. Chastain, 594 P.2d 458,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 416

(Wyo. 1979), overruled, Olson v. State, 698 P.2d 107,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 471

(Wyo. 1985).

“No right to attorney” before taking test. —

Police officers, whether or not they give a Miranda warning to an individual, should include a brief statement that the individual has no right to an attorney before taking a chemical test. Nesius v. State Dep't of Revenue & Taxation, 791 P.2d 939,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 1990).

Not necessary to tell driver number of days of possible suspension. —

It is not necessary to tell an arrested driver the specific number of days that his driving privileges may or will be suspended if he refuses to take a chemical test. State v. Marquez, 638 P.2d 1292,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 285

(Wyo. 1982), overruled, Olson v. State, 698 P.2d 107,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 471

(Wyo. 1985).

Blood test not admissible in DWUI trial but admissible in another proceeding. —

Where defendant did not consent to a blood test, Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 31-6-102(d) required that such evidence be suppressed in a DWUI trial; however, defendant's blood alcohol test was admissible in defendant's prosecution for causing bodily injury to a peace officer engaged in his duties and for causing property damage. Wheaton v. State, 2003 WY 56, 68 P.3d 1167,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 2003).

Driver arrested for driving under the influence reasonably informed of rights. —

A driver arrested for driving under the influence who was told by the officer that “I advise your license to operate will be suspended” and that the suspension time was “up to the motor vehicle department,” was reasonably informed of his rights and duties under this section and was not tricked or misled into taking the chemical test. Olson v. State, 698 P.2d 107,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 471

(Wyo. 1985).

Determination that person “incapable of refusal” determined by investigating officer. —

The determination that a person is “unconscious” or “incapable of refusal” is, of necessity, to be determined by the investigating officer based on the best available evidence. State v. Chastain, 594 P.2d 458,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 416

(Wyo. 1979), overruled, Olson v. State, 698 P.2d 107,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 471

(Wyo. 1985).

Consent to test may be withdrawn. —

Under subsection (c), a test may be given without there being consent, an arrest or the need to convey any information to the individual in question, but the suspect may, at the appropriate time, withdraw his consent, i.e., when he is conscious or becomes capable of refusing. State v. Chastain, 594 P.2d 458,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 416

(Wyo. 1979), overruled, Olson v. State, 698 P.2d 107,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 471

(Wyo. 1985).

Driver withdrawing consent subject to suspension provisions. —

An unconscious or otherwise incapacitated driver who withdraws his consent when he is so able is subject to the suspension provisions. State v. Chastain, 594 P.2d 458,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 416

(Wyo. 1979), overruled, Olson v. State, 698 P.2d 107,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 471

(Wyo. 1985).

Intentional Refusal —

Because a motorist's failure to provide a sufficient breath sample constituted an intentional refusal to perform an offered breath test for purposes of Wyoming's implied consent laws, the booking officer was not required to offer a blood or urine test following the refusal.
Faber v. State, 2009 WY 137, 220 P.3d 236,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 2009).

Substantial evidence supported a hearing examiner's finding that a motorist intentionally failed or refused to perform a breath test after the motorist was arrested for driving under the influence of intoxicating liquor. Intentional failure constituted a refusal to take the breath test, which refusal led to the statutory implied consent suspension of the motorist's driving privileges and the additional statutory disqualification from driving a commercial motor vehicle.
Faber v. State, 2009 WY 137, 220 P.3d 236,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 2009).

Driver may not rescind refusal. —

Once a driver has refused to take a chemical test, the driver may not rescind that decision with a subsequent consent, but is bound by the legal consequences of his initial refusal. Farmer v. State, 986 P.2d 165,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 145

(Wyo. 1999).

Preliminary breath test. —

A preliminary breath test given to a motorist stopped for suspicion of driving under the influence was not relevant to a license-revocation procedure because it was obtained prior to the arrest and the advisement required by the statute. Nellis v. Wyoming DOT, 932 P.2d 741,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1997).

Time of blood test. —

The results of a blood test administered 36 minutes after a motorist was stopped for suspicion of driving under the influence were admissible to support a determination of intoxication. Nellis v. Wyoming DOT, 932 P.2d 741,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1997).

After appellant performed poorly on the horizontal gaze nystagmus test and the walk and turn test, he was arrested for driving while under the influence of alcohol in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 31-5-233(b) and his licence was suspended pursuant to this section; the hearing examiner's decision that the officer complied with the 15 minute observation period for admission of a chemical test was supported by the Operational Checklist showing appellant was observed for an eighteen-minute period after the officer checked his mouth before his breath sample was taken.
Hwang v. State, 2011 WY 20, 247 P.3d 861,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 2011).

Blood test may be taken incident to arrest for vehicular homicide. —

If the factual situation gives rise to a charge of vehicular homicide or the potential for such a charge, a blood test may be taken incident to an arrest for such a crime and may be admissible without regard to this chapter. State v. Chastain, 594 P.2d 458,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 416

(Wyo. 1979), overruled, Olson v. State, 698 P.2d 107,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 471

(Wyo. 1985); Van Order v. State, 600 P.2d 1056,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 463

(Wyo. 1979).

Approval of test by department of health. —

Where the officer gave the driver the implied consent advisement required under Wyoming law, and the driver refused to submit to chemical testing as required, the driver could not establish that any chemical analysis of his blood, breath or urine would not have been performed according to methods approved by the department of health; the question of whether the tests were approved arose once the test was performed, not before. Bryant v. State ex rel. Wyo. DOT, 2002 WY 140, 55 P.3d 4,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 167

(Wyo. 2002), op. withdrawn,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. Sept. 25, 2002).

Driver's license suspension proceedings were “instituted,”

within the meaning of § 16-3-113(c), when the department forwarded a motorist's request for a hearing to an independent hearing examiner, and not when the officer who arrested her for driving under the influence furnished her with a notice of suspension and a temporary driver's license. Gerstell v. State, 769 P.2d 389,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 1989).

Hearing scheduled within 45 days of request. —

The clear intent of subsection (f) is that a hearing must be scheduled within 45 days of receipt of the request. There is no requirement that the hearing be held with 45 days. Department of Revenue and Taxation v. Hamilton, 743 P.2d 877,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 517

(Wyo. 1987).

Suspension proceedings civil in nature. —

Driver's license suspensions under this section do not constitute punishment for purposes of double jeopardy, but are civil proceedings, separate and distinct from prosecutions for driving while under the influence. Glasrud v. City of Laramie, 934 P.2d 1242,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1997).

Presence of attorney representing state is not required at implied consent hearings

to support the license suspension of one arrested and charged with driving while under the influence who refuses to submit to chemical sobriety testing. The certified arrest documentation alone is sufficient to support a license suspension. Hooten v. Department of Revenue & Taxation, 751 P.2d 1323,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1988).

The department of revenue and taxation is not required to appear either personally or through an attorney in an implied consent driver's license suspension hearing. It may submit its case by certified record on the refusal form given to the licensee at the time of his arrest. Drake v. State, 751 P.2d 1319,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1988).

Proof of probable cause to arrest. —

This section requires the peace officer to have probable cause that the licensee was driving while under the influence. However, a license revocation hearing is civil in nature and the probable cause must only be proven by a preponderance of the evidence. Department of Revenue & Taxation v. Hull, 751 P.2d 351,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1988).

Suspension of a driver's license for failing to submit to a breath test was affirmed where the Office of Administrative Hearings' order set forth findings of fact sufficient to establish that probable cause existed; the signed statement of a deputy who had arrested the driver set forth his observations of the driver, including: (1) the driver's pickup truck appeared to have run off the road; (2) the driver walked with a staggered gait, his speech was slurred, and his breath smelled of alcohol; (3) the driver admitted to having consumed several shots of whisky and some beer, the last of which he consumed only 15 minutes before the deputy arrived; (4) the driver was able to successfully perform only one of five field sobriety tests; and (5) the driver refused to submit to chemical testing. Bradshaw v. Wyo. DOT Drivers' License Div., 2006 WY 70, 135 P.3d 612,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 2006).

Fruit of the poisonous tree doctrine did not apply in a license suspension proceeding held under the implied consent statutes, because the officer had probable cause to arrest appellant for interference with a police officer and probable cause to believe appellant was driving under the influence of alcohol. Appellant was hindering the officer's efforts to investigate a hit and run accident involving a vehicle registered to appellant, smelled of alcohol, was swaying, gave the officer a false name and refused to show the officer his driver's license.
Vasco v. State, 2011 WY 100, 253 P.3d 515,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 2011).

Fact that evidence might have come forth after defendant's arrest, indicating defendant was in a diabetic ketoacidosis state, did not change the conclusion that an officer had probable cause at the time to believe defendant was driving while intoxicated; hence, defendant's driver's license was properly suspended under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 31-6-102(e).
Wyo. DOT v. State ex rel. DOT, 2012 WY 33, 271 P.3d 1003,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 2012), reh'g denied,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. Apr. 3, 2012).

Defendant's
warrantless arrest at a hospital by a patrol sergeant with a county
sheriff's department was constitutional because it was based on information
gathered by a state trooper, who was investigating defendant's automobile
accident. The sergeant's conduct in arranging to collect a urine
sample
for testing at the behest of the trooper, therefore, complied
with
the statutory requirement that the test for alcohol be incidental
to a lawful arrest for driving under the influence. Stowe v. State, 2014 WY 97, 331 P.3d 127,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 2014).

Probable cause to initiate traffic stop. —

Driver's license was properly suspended under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

31-6-102

because a police officer had probable cause to initiate a traffic stop as the forklift operated by the driver on the shoulder of a highway was “special mobile equipment” under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 31-5-921(d) and thus required to have a “slow moving vehicle” emblem.
Harvey v. State, 2011 WY 72, 250 P.3d 167,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 2011).

Proper warnings given. —

Because there was substantial evidence in the record to sustain a conclusion that a driver was given complete implied consent advisements and that he was not misled about what his rights were under the implied consent laws, court refused to second-guess the credibility determination made by a hearing officer leading to an implied consent suspension and a commercial vehicle disqualification.
Hittner v. State ex rel. Wyo. DOT (In re Hittner), 2008 WY 91, 189 P.3d 872,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 2008).

In an administrative license suspension proceeding, the Office of Administrative Hearings
and the district court correctly held that appellant was accurately
advised of the consequences of refusing to submit to a chemical
test
under this section upon her arrest for DUI; therefore, the
officer's additional advisement that she could be prosecuted under
a municipal
ordinance for refusing to take a breath test did not trick or mislead
appellant.
Walters v. State ex rel. Wyo. DOT, 2013 WY 59, 300 P.3d 879,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 2013).

Unlawful stop and arrest. —

License suspension for refusing to submit to chemical testing was error because the driver was unlawfully stopped and arrested by a campus police officer outside of campus boundaries. Marshall v. State ex rel. DOT, 941 P.2d 42,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 1997).

Officer's narrative report properly admitted into evidence. —

Where an arresting officer's statement pursuant to subsection (d) consisted only of the officer's signed statement on which was written “see attached report,” and the officer's narrative report of the defendant's arrest was attached, the hearing officer properly admitted the signed statement and report into evidence as a certified record. Nesius v. State Dep't of Revenue & Taxation, 791 P.2d 939,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 1990).

Implied consent form deemed public record. —

The implied consent form required by subsection (g) of this section is a public record and falls within Rule 803(8), W.R.E., as a hearsay exception. Department of Revenue & Taxation v. Hull, 751 P.2d 351,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1988).

But need not be returned to prosecutor. —

There is nothing in the relevant statutes or agency regulations or rules that requires the department of revenue and taxation to honor a prosecutor's request for return of implied consent license suspension documents. Drake v. State, 751 P.2d 1319,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1988).

Abundant evidence to find guilt without breath test result. —

There is abundant, even overwhelming, evidence before the court from which the judge can find the defendant guilty without the result of a breath test where there is evidence of excessive speed, erratic driving, a strong odor of alcohol, a flushed face and slurred speech, and the failure of a field sobriety test. Vrooman v. State, 642 P.2d 782,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 318

(Wyo. 1982).

Suppression of test results. —

District court erred in denying defendant's motion to suppress the results of his blood alcohol concentration test because the affidavit in support of the search warrant was deficient since it contained bare conclusions; the judge issuing the warrant was not provided with facts supporting the officer's conclusion that defendant was driving when the warrant was issued, and some of the underlying factual information supporting that conclusion was essential to support issuance of the warrant. Snell v. State, 2014 WY 46, 322 P.3d 38,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 2014).

Return of license following acquittal. —

By cross-referencing statutory provisions, legislature intended that suspended driver was “otherwise entitled” to have her license returned to her once she was acquitted of criminal charge, unless there was a reason, other than suspension itself, to retain the license. Wyoming DOT v. Haglund, 982 P.2d 699,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 1999).

Misplacement of license by law officers. —

Although plaintiff's driver's license was lost while in the possession of the law enforcement agency and she was deprived of its use and possession until she retained a replacement license, at her cost, this did not constitute a deprivation of her due process rights. The misplacement of her license constituted a “random and unauthorized” act for which no pre-deprivation process could have been contemplated. Therefore, post-deprivation process would have been constitutionally adequate. Pogue v. Allison, 851 F. Supp. 1536, 1994 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 6234 (D. Wyo. 1994).

Collateral estoppel.—

Collateral estoppel did not bar the Office of Administrative Hearings from considering appellant’s blood alcohol content (BAC) test results in a driver’s license suspension proceeding because three of the four requirements for collateral estoppel to apply had not been met. The issue was not decided in the prior criminal proceeding, there was no privity between the party against whom collateral estoppel was asserted and the party to the previous criminal litigation, and the party against whom collateral estoppel was asserted had no opportunity to litigate the admissibility of the BAC test results in the criminal matter. Casiano v. State ex rel. Wyo. DOT, 2019 WY 16, 434 P.3d 116,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 2019).

Applied

in

Parodi v. Wyoming DOT, 947 P.2d 1294,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Wyo. 1997).

Quoted

in

Department of Revenue & Taxation v. Shipley, 579 P.2d 415,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 294

(Wyo. 1978); Allen v. State, 2002 WY 48, 43 P.3d 551,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 65

(Wyo. 2002).

Cited

in

Wilson v. State ex rel. Office of Hearing Exmr., 841 P.2d 90,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1992)Peterson v. Wyo. DOT, 2007 WY 90, 158 P.3d 706,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 98

; Matthews v. State, 2014 WY 54,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 60

(Apr 23, 2014).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Breathalyzers: Should the State Be Required to Preserve the Ampoules?” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 299 (1980).

For comment, “The New Implied Consent Amendments: A Step in the Right Direction,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 165 (1986).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Admissibility, in criminal case, of blood alcohol test where blood was taken from unconscious driver, 72 ALR3d 325.

Duty of law enforcement officer to offer suspect chemical sobriety test under implied consent law, 95 ALR3d 710.

Necessity and sufficiency of proof that tests of blood alcohol concentration were conducted in conformance with prescribed methods, 96 ALR3d 745.

Request before submitting to chemical sobriety test to communicate with counsel as refusal to take test, 97 ALR3d 852.

Request for prior administration of additional test as constituting refusal to submit to chemical sobriety test under implied consent law, 98 ALR3d 572.

Motorist's right to private sobriety test, 45 ALR4th 11.

Sufficiency of showing of physical inability to take tests for driving while intoxicated to justify refusal, 68 ALR4th 776.

Challenges to use or breath tests for drunk drivers based on claim that partition or conversion ratio between measured breath alcohol and actual blood alcohol is inaccurate, 90 ALR4th 155.

Validity of police roadblocks or checkpoints for purpose of discovery of alcoholic intoxication — post-Sitz cases, 74 ALR5th 319.

Mental incapacity as justifying refusal to submit to tests for driving while intoxicated, 76 ALR5th 597.

Authentication of organic nonblood specimen taken from human body for purposes of analysis, 78 ALR5th 1.